North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 14A. Licensing and Regulation of Rendering Plants, Rendering Operations, and Waste Kitchen Grease Collection.

§ 106-168.1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this Article, unless the context or subject matter otherwise clearly requires,

“Collector” means any person, as defined in this section, who collects raw material for the purpose of selling the same to any renderer for further processing.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association or corporation.

“Raw material” means inedible whole or portion of animal or poultry carcasses.

“Rendering operation” means the processing of inedible whole or portion of animal or poultry carcasses and includes collection of such raw material for the purpose of processing.

“Rendering plant” means the building or buildings in which raw material is processed and the premises upon which said building or buildings used in connection with such processing are located.

“Waste kitchen grease” means animal fats or vegetable oils that have been used, and will not be reused, for cooking in a food establishment. “Waste kitchen grease” does not include grease septage as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2012-127, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-127, s. 2, effective January 1, 2013, added subdivision (6).

§ 106-168.2.
License required.

No person shall engage in rendering operations unless such person shall hold a valid license to do so issued as hereinafter provided.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.3.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this Article shall apply to the premises or the rendering operations on the premises of any establishment operating under a numbered permit from the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services as provided by the North Carolina Meat Inspection Act, or under United States government inspection.

History.

1953, c. 732; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-168.4.
Application for license.

Application for license shall be made to the Commissioner of Agriculture, hereinafter called the “Commissioner,” on forms provided by him. The application shall set forth the name and residence of the applicant, his present or proposed place of business, the particular method which he intends to employ or employs in the processing of raw material, and such other information as the Commissioner may require, except that the Commissioner shall not require the submission of blueprints, plans, or specifications of the existing plant or equipment of any person owning and operating a rendering plant in North Carolina on January 1, 1953. The applicant shall pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) with each application, which said fee shall be the only charge made in connection with licensure.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-113, s. 4(a), effective July 26, 2016.

History.

1953, c. 732; 1957, c. 1357, s. 13; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1989, c. 727, s. 219(31); 1997-261, s. 109; 1997-443, s. 11A.42; 2012-127, s. 3; repealed by 2016-113, s. 4(a), effective July 26, 2016.

§ 106-168.6.
Inspection; certificate of specific findings.

Upon receipt of an application for license, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall promptly inspect the plans, specifications, and selected site in the case of proposed rendering plants and shall inspect the buildings, grounds, and equipment of established rendering plants. If the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee finds that the plans, specifications, and selected site in the case of proposed plants, or the buildings, grounds, and equipment in the case of established plants, comply with the requirements of this Article and the rules and regulations promulgated under the authority of this Article, the Commissioner shall certify the findings in writing. If there is a failure in any respect to meet such requirements, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall notify the applicant in writing of such deficiencies and shall, within a reasonable time to be determined by the Commissioner, make a second inspection. If the specified defects are remedied, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall certify the findings in writing. Not more than two inspections shall be required under any one application.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2016-113, s. 4(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 4(b), effective July 26, 2016, rewrote the section.

§ 106-168.7.
Issuance of license.

Upon certification in accordance with G.S. 105-168.6, the Commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant to conduct rendering operations as specified in the application. A license shall be valid until revoked for cause as hereinafter provided.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2016-113, s. 4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 4(c), effective July 26, 2016, substituted “Upon certification in accordance with G.S. 105-168.6” for “Upon receipt of the certificate of compliance from the committee” at the beginning.

§ 106-168.8.
Minimum standards for conducting rendering operations.

The following minimum standards shall be required for all rendering operations subject to the provisions of this Article:

Buildings utilized in connection with the rendering plant shall be of sufficient size and shape to accommodate all phases of actual or intended processing. Adequate partitions shall be installed therein so as to eliminate any contact between raw materials and finished products and so as to preclude contamination of finished products. The buildings shall be constructed in a manner and of materials which will insure adequate drainage and sanitation in all phases of operation.

Raw material upon arrival at the rendering plant shall be unloaded into a building for processing. All raw material shall be processed by approved methods within 24 hours after delivery to the rendering plant.

Processing equipment shall be airtight, except for proper escapes for vapors caused by the cooking process.

Cooking vapors shall be controlled and disposed of by approved methods.

Vehicles used to transport raw material shall be so constructed as to prevent any drippings or seepings from such material from escaping from the truck. Such vehicles shall have body sides of sufficient height that no portion of any raw material transported therein shall be visible. All vehicles shall be provided with suitable top or covering to prevent the spread of disease by flies or other agents during the transportation of raw material.

All vehicles and containers used in transporting raw material shall be disinfected at the earliest practicable time after unloading, and shall, in any event, be disinfected before again being taken upon a public highway or before leaving the rendering plant. Approved facilities and materials for disinfection shall be carried on vehicles transporting carcasses. Employees shall be required to wear rubber boots which shall be disinfected prior to entry to a farm.

Approved facilities, means and methods for disinfection shall be available at the rendering plant at all times. Employees and employees’ clothing coming in contact with raw material shall be disinfected before coming in contact with any finished products, or any portion of the plant in which the same are located. Rodent and fly control measures shall be practiced as a further means of prevention of the spread of disease.

Proof of general liability insurance of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be made in a manner satisfactory to the Commissioner.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2012-127, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-127, s. 4, effective January 1, 2013, added subdivision (8).

§ 106-168.9.
Transportation by licensee.

Any person holding a license under the provisions of this Article, or acting as a collector as herein defined, may haul and transport raw material, except such material as may be specifically prohibited by law or by the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner, when such transporting and hauling is done in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.10.
Disposal of diseased animals.

Any person holding a license under the provisions of this Article is authorized to kill diseased, sick, old or crippled animals on the premises of the owner upon his request; provided that no animal known to have tuberculosis, Bang’s disease, anthrax, or any other disease for which quarantine may be imposed, shall be removed from any premises placed under quarantine without permission of the State Veterinarian, or his authorized agent. The licensee shall keep and make available to the Commissioner, upon request, such records as the Commissioner may require with respect to the collection and disposal of dead animals.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.11.
Authority of agents of licensee.

Authority granted to any person holding a valid license under the provisions of this Article shall extend also to the agents and employees of such person while acting within the scope of their authority. All such agents and employees shall comply with the provisions of this Article and rules and regulations not inconsistent therewith, and shall display evidence of such employment or agency upon proper request at any time while so acting.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.12.
Commissioner authorized to adopt rules and regulations.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby authorized to make and establish reasonable rules and regulations, consistent with the provisions of this Article, for the proper administration and enforcement thereof.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2016-113, s. 4(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 4(d), effective July 26, 2016, in the section, substituted “consistent” for “not inconsistent” near the middle and deleted “after consulting the committee” preceding “for the proper administration.”

§ 106-168.13.
Effect of failure to comply.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this Article or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Article shall be cause of revocation of license, if such failure shall not be remedied within a reasonable time after notice to the licensee. Any person whose license is revoked may reapply for a license in the manner provided in this Article for an initial application, except that the Commissioner shall not be required to cause the rendering plant and equipment of the applicant to be inspected until the expiration of 30 days from the date of revocation.

History.

1953, c. 732; 2016-113, s. 4(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-113, s. 4(e), effective July 26, 2016, in the section, substituted “adopted pursuant to this Article” for “not inconsistent therewith” near the middle of the first sentence, and deleted “by the committee” following “inspected” near the end of the second sentence.

§ 106-168.14.
Collectors subject to certain provisions.

Any collector, as defined in this Article, shall be subject to the provisions of subdivision (5) and subdivision (6) of

G.S. 106-168.8

and the provisions of

G.S. 106-168.9

, and any rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner pursuant thereto.

History.

1953, c. 732.

§ 106-168.14A.
Collectors of waste kitchen grease subject to certain provisions.

For purposes of this section, “collector of waste kitchen grease” means any person who collects waste kitchen grease for the purpose of selling the same to any renderer or other person for further processing.

Any collector of waste kitchen grease who sells the waste kitchen grease collected shall provide the purchaser with a statement of ownership setting forth the lawful ownership of the waste kitchen grease sold to such purchaser.

History.

2012-127, s. 5.

§ 106-168.15.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person conducting rendering operations or collecting raw material in violation of the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1953, c. 732; 1993, c. 539, s. 745; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-168.16.
Civil penalties.

The Commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule promulgated thereunder. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1995, c. 516, s. 7; 1998-215, s. 8.